Missouri, session 2026, HB1752.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 321, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 321.295, to read as follows:
321.295. 1. (1) The board of directors of a fire protection district may distribute
surplus or unneeded supplies or property to volunteer fire protection associations, as
defined in section 320.300, to fire protection districts, to fire departments, and to eligible
donees, as such term is defined in connection with the federal surplus property
program, in the same manner as provided for the distribution of federal surplus
property.
(2) The board may distribute surplus or unneeded supplies or property to an
organization registered as a nonprofit organization under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)3, as
amended, or to a public service corporation that provides training to fire departments,
emergency medical technicians, or police officers in search and recovery techniques,
water rescue, ice rescue, or watercraft operation in the same manner as provided for the
distribution of federal surplus property.
2. The board of directors of a fire protection district may sell surplus or
unneeded supplies or property that is not transferred to fire protection associations,
districts, or departments or eligible donees to the general public by auction, sealed bid.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 1 and 2 of this section to the
contrary, the board of directors of a fire protection district shall not donate or sell
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1752 2
surplus emergency vehicles or unneeded supplies or property to board members,
officers, or employees of the fire protection district or their relatives within the fourth
degree by consanguinity or affinity, nor to an entity of which a board member, officer, or
employee is a board member or officer unless such surplus is sold on an online auction
platform approved by the Missouri office of administration.
✔